Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-12.5] Development of property;
partnership or development agreement. (a) Any public housing project may
be developed under sections 356D-11 and 356D-12 by the authority in partnership
or under a development agreement with a private party; provided that a written
partnership or development agreement is executed by the authority. At a
minimum, the partnership or development agreement shall provide for:

(1) A determination by the authority that the
partnership or development agreement is for a public purpose; and

(2) Final approval by the authority of the plans and
specifications for the public housing project.

(b) For the development of public housing
projects pursuant to subsection (a), except as provided by federal law or
regulation, the authority shall not be subject to chapters 103 and 103D or any
and all other requirements of law for competitive bidding for partnership or
development agreements, construction contracts, or other contracts; provided
that the authority shall develop internal policies and procedures for the
procurement of goods, services, and construction, consistent with the goals of
public accountability and public procurement practices.

(c) The authority shall submit an annual
report to the legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session, on the status of all public housing projects being
developed using partnership or development agreements pursuant to subsection
(a).

(d) The authority may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section. [L 2012, c 164, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next